Maryland, session 2026, HB0586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
23–403.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection AND
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, each board of library trustees consists of seven
APPOINTED members appointed by the county governing body from nominees submitted
by the board of library trustees.
(2) A board that existed before 1945 under a corporate charter may
continue as constituted if:
(i) It has at least seven APPOINTED members;
(ii) The APPOINTED members are chosen on the basis of character,
ability, and demonstrated interest in library matters; and
(iii) The APPOINTED members meet the qualifications required
under subsection (b) of this section.
(3) In Harford County, the Board of Trustees consists of at least 7
APPOINTED members, but not more than 11 APPOINTED members, appointed by the
county governing body from nominees submitted by the Board of Trustees.
– 1 –

Ch. 621 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The APPOINTED members of the board shall be:
(1) Representative of the area the library serves; and
(2) Residents of the county that the library serves.
(c) (1) (I) Except as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section, [a]
AN APPOINTED member of a board serves for a term of 5 years and until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(II) [These] THE terms OF THE APPOINTED MEMBERS are
staggered as required by the terms of the APPOINTED members serving on the board as of
July 1, 1978.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, [a] AN
APPOINTED member may be reappointed but may not serve more than two consecutive
terms.
(3) [A] AN APPOINTED member appointed to fill a vacancy in an
unexpired term:
(i) Serves only for the remainder of that term and until a successor
is appointed and qualifies; and
(ii) Is eligible for appointment to serve two additional consecutive
terms.
(4) [A] AN APPOINTED member of the Board of the Prince George’s
County Memorial Library System may serve an unlimited number of consecutive terms of
office.
(d) In Charles County, [a] AN APPOINTED member of the Board serves for a term
of 4 years.
(e) In Harford County, [a] AN APPOINTED member of the Board serves for a term
of 5 years, beginning on July 1, and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(f) Each member of a board serves without compensation.
(G) (1) A BOARD MAY PROVIDE FOR THE SELECTION OF A STUDENT
MEMBER OF THE BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) A STUDENT MEMBER SHALL BE SELECTED BY A PROCESS
ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 621
(3) THE STUDENT MEMBER OF A BOARD SHALL:
(I) BE A JUNIOR OR SENIOR YEAR STUDENT ENROLLED IN A
PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL OR A HOME INSTRUCTION PROGRAM IN THE
COUNTY THAT THE LIBRARY SERVES, WHO IS OF GOOD CHARACTER AND, IN THE
CASE OF A STUDENT ENROLLED IN A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL, IS IN
GOOD STANDING IN THE STUDENT’S HIGH SCHOOL;
(II) BE SELECTED IN THE STUDENT’S SOPHOMORE OR JUNIOR
YEAR BY A METHOD ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD;
(III) HAVE AN INTEREST IN LIBRARY MATTERS; AND
(IV) SERVE A TERM OF 1 YEAR.
(4) A STUDENT MEMBER SELECTED TO FILL A VACANCY IN AN
UNEXPIRED TERM:
(I) SERVES ONLY FOR THE REMAINDER OF THAT TERM AND
UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS SELECTED AND QUALIFIES; AND
(II) IS ELIGIBLE FOR SELECTION FOR A FULL TERM IF THE
STUDENT MEETS THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(5) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
STUDENT MEMBER OF A BOARD MAY VOTE ON ALL POLICY MATTERS BEFORE THE
BOARD.
(II) A BOARD MAY ADOPT A POLICY OR BYLAW TO AUTHORIZE A
STUDENT MEMBER TO VOTE ON ADDITIONAL NONPOLICY MATTERS BEFORE THE
BOARD.
23–404.
(a) Each year, each board of library trustees:
(1) Shall elect one of its APPOINTED members as its [chairman] CHAIR;
and
(2) May elect any other officer it requires FROM AMONG THE APPOINTED
MEMBERS OF THE BOARD.
– 3 –

Ch. 621 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The treasurer of each board of library trustees shall be bonded adequately.
(c) Each board of library trustees may determine the time and place of its
meetings and may adopt rules for the conduct of its meetings. However:
(1) Each board shall meet at least once every 3 months;
(2) Any final action of a board shall be taken at a public meeting; and
(3) The minutes of board meetings shall be open to the public.
(d) (1) Any member of a board of library trustees who fails to attend at least
half of the scheduled meetings of the board during any calendar year shall be considered to
have resigned from the board.
(2) The [chairman] CHAIR of the board of library trustees shall report the
member’s name and nonattendance to the county governing body by January 15 of the
following year.
(3) The county governing body may reject the resignation if the member
explains his nonattendance satisfactorily.
(4) The resignation is effective from the date of the final review by the
county governing body, which shall be within 10 days after it receives the report from the
[chairman] CHAIR of the board of library trustees. The county governing body shall fill any
resulting vacancy as provided in § 23–403 of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 4 –